Hawaii, session 2025, GM1275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that fourteen states have
adopted programs known as "Universal Purchase" or "Universal
Select" (collectively, UP), which provide state-purchased access
to some or all recommended immunizations to children and adults
in those states. UP immunization purchases occur at a
discounted price through contracts otherwise intended for more
established and familiar immunization purchasing programs such
as the Vaccines For Children Program (Public Law 103-66) and
Public Health Services Act, Section 317 Immunization Program
(Public Law 78-410) . Other varied state approaches include
superseding private sources of coverage and assessing health
insurance plans for the cost of the program and disallowing
provider use of private immunization stock.
The legislature further finds that states with UP programs
that allow state health officials to manage the supply of
immunizations lowered health care providers' administrative
costs and ensured that the states can quickly supply
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx
■IIHIIIIIUMMNIUIUI

S.B. NO.
C D. 2
immunizations to vulnerable patient groups during emergencies or
immunization shortages. The potential benefits to Hawaii's
health care and public health system make investment in a UP
program worthwhile.
The purpose of this Act is to establish a universal
immunization funding program in the State.
SECTION 2. Chapter 325, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and
to read as follows:
"PART UNIVERSAL IMMUNIZATION FUNDING PROGRAM
§325- Definitions. As used in this part:
"Adult covered lives" means all adults under the age of
sixty-five who have immunizations covered:
(1) By an individual or group health insurance policy,
plan, contract, or agreement issued or delivered in
the State;
(2) By a group health insurance policy evidenced by a
certificate of insurance issued or delivered to an
individual residing in the State;
(3) By an employee benefit plan of a self-insured entity
or a government plan for any employer or government
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx
MIIHIUIIIIinMilllMI

Page 3 S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
entity that has an office or other worksite located in
the State or has two or more employees; or
(4) As a participant or beneficiary of a health cost
sharing program.
"Assessed entity" means an insurer that is not a medicare
advantage health plan and is governed by article lOA of
chapter 431, a nonprofit mutual benefit society governed by
article 1 of chapter 432, a fraternal benefit society governed
by article 2 of chapter 432, or a health maintenance
organization governed by chapter 432D.
"Assessment" means the association member liability with
respect to immunization costs determined in accordance with this
part.
"Child covered lives" means all children aged eighteen
years or younger who have immunizations covered:
(1) By an individual or group health insurance policy,
plan, contract, or agreement issued or delivered in
the State;
(2) By a group health insurance policy evidenced by a
certificate of insurance issued or delivered to an
individual residing in the State;
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx
MiinniiiiHiw

Page 4 S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
(3) By an employee benefit plan of a self-insured entity
or a government plan for any employer or government
entity that has an office or other worksite located in
the State or has two or more employees; or
(4) As a participant or beneficiary of a health cost
sharing program.
"Department" means the department of health.
"Director" means the director of health or the director's
designee.
"Estimated adult immunization cost" means the estimated
cost to the State for the purchase and distribution of adult
immunizations.
"Estimated child immunization cost" means the estimated
cost to the State for the purchase and distribution of child
immunizations.
"Health cost sharing program" means any cost sharing or
similar program that seeks to share the costs of health care
services and that in the preceding twelve months has either
coordinated payment for or reimbursed over $10,000 of costs for
health care services delivered in the State or communicated by
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx
wiiHHinnimnw

Page 5 S.B. NO. 1434
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
mail or electronic media to residents of the State concerning
its potential participation.
"Immunization" means any preparation of killed
microorganisms, living attenuated organisms, living fully
virulent organisms, or part thereof, or any other treatment
intended to trigger an immune response that is authorized by the
United States Food and Drug Administration, recommended by the
national Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the
federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or has been
authorized for purchase by the director for the purposes of
producing or increasing immunity to particular diseases.
"Immunization" includes any other substance designated as such
by order of the director.
"Program" means the universal immunization funding program
established under this part.
"Provider" means a person licensed by the State to
administer immunizations or provide health care services or a
partnership or corporation or other entity made up of those
persons.
"Vaccines for children program" means the federal
entitlement program established under title 42 United States
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx

Page 6 S.B. NO. 1434
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C D. 2
Code section 1396s, which provides immunizations at no charge
for eligible children eighteen years of age or younger.
§325- Universal immunization funding program;
established. (a) There is established within the department
the universal immunization funding program for the purpose of
providing immunizations to individuals in the State.
(b) The department may contract with other entities for
any services needed to carry out the purposes of this part.
§325- Universal immunization purchase special fund;
established. (a) There is established in the state treasury
the universal immunization purchase special fund into which
shall be deposited:
(1) Fees, fines, and cost reimbursements collected from
assessed entities pursuant to this part;
(2) Appropriations made by the legislature;
(3) Grants, contracts, donations, and private
contributions;
(4) Moneys from the federal Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services and other federal agencies;
(5) All interest earned or accrued from the investment of
moneys in the fund; and
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx 6

Page 7 S.B. NO.
C D. 2
(6) Any other moneys made available to the special fund
from other sources.
(b) The fund shall be administered and expended by the
department.
(c) Expenditures from the fund shall be used for the
purchase of immunizations and the administration of the program.
§32 5- Assessments. (a) The director shall determine
immunization assessment rates as follows:
(1) Provide estimated child immunization costs and
estimated adult immunization costs, not covered by the
vaccines for children program or any of its
successors, for the succeeding fiscal year no later
than ninety days before the commencement of each state
fiscal year;
(2) Add estimates to cover the department's operating
costs for the program;
(3) Add a reserve of up to ten per cent of the sum of the
preceding fiscal year's program costs and for
unanticipated costs;
(4) Add a working capital reserve in such amount as may be
reasonably determined by the director;
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx

Page 8 S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
(5) Subtract or add the amount of any surplus or deficit
in the fund, including any net investment income
earned, as of the end of the preceding state fiscal
year; and
(6) Calculate the immunization assessment rates as a
per-child covered life per month and per-adult covered
life per month amount to be self-reported and paid by
all assessed entities by dividing the annual amount
determined in accordance with paragraphs (1) through
(5) by the number of children and adults,
respectively, projected to be covered by the assessed
entities during the succeeding program year, divided
by twelve.
(b) No later than forty-five days following the close of
each state fiscal year, the department shall provide an
accounting of immunization purchase funds not covered by any
state or other program to determine the final amount needed to
cover the prior fiscal year.
Unless determined by the director, any assessed entity that
would otherwise be responsible for reimbursement to any provider
for any immunization administration shall be responsible for
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx

Page 9 S.B. NO. 1434
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
CD. 2
reporting the child covered life and adult covered life and for
payment of the corresponding assessment to the department. The
department shall establish by rule the frequency, schedule, and
methodology of the assessments that the assessed entities shall
be subject to.
(c) At any time after one full calendar year of operation
under subsections (a) and (b), the director may make changes to
the assessment collection mechanism. Any changes shall be
reflected in an updated plan of operation available to the
public.
(d) If an assessed entity has not paid in accordance with
this section, interest shall accrue at one per cent per month,
compounded monthly on or after the due date.
(e) The director may determine an interim assessment for
new immunizations or public health emergencies and shall
calculate a supplemental interim assessment using the
methodology outlined under subsection (a) for regular
assessments, but payable within forty-five days of the interim
assessment notice. The director shall not impose more than one
interim assessment per year, except in the case of a public
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx

Page 10 S.B. NO.
C D. 2
health emergency declared in accordance with federal or state
law.
(f) For purposes of assessments, medical loss ratio
calculations, and reimbursement by plan sponsors, all
association assessments shall be considered pharmaceutical or
medical benefit costs and not regulatory or administrative
costs.
(g) If the department discontinues operation of the
program for any reason, any unexpended assessments, including
unexpended funds from prior assessments in the universal
immunization purchase special fund, shall be refunded to
assessed entities in proportion to the current fiscal year's
assessment rate.
§325- Reports and audits. (a) The department shall
audit assessed entities and providers in accordance with the
reporting and compliance requirements of the program. Each
assessed entity shall report its number of child and adult
covered lives according to a schedule determined by the director
and respond to any requests by the director related to covered
lives or assessments due. Any assessed entity that fails to
respond to an audit request within ten business days of the
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx 1
IHlIiimiiMiH

S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
receipt of notification of audit request shall be responsible
for prompt payment of fees of any outside auditor engaged by the
department to determine the information and shall make all
records requested by the department-engaged auditors available
for inspection and copying at the location within the State as
specified by the auditor.
(b) Each provider administering immunizations in the State
that are supplied via federal vaccination programs or the
program shall report to the Hawaii immunization registry
pursuant to section 325-122 any data related to immunizations as
the department determines is necessary for disease prevention,
control, and immunization inventory management and
accountability purposes.
(c) Failure to cure non-compliance with any reporting,
auditing, or assessment obligation to the department no later
than thirty days from the postmarked date of written notice of
noncompliance may subject the assessed entity to fines, fees,
and other costs of enforcement established pursuant to
subsection (d). Any monetary fine, fee, or cost reimbursement
shall be remitted to the universal immunization purchase special
fund.
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx 1

Page 12
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 2
(d) Any entity that violates this part shall be fined not
more than $1,000 for each separate offense. Each day of
violation shall constitute a separate offense. The assessed
entity shall also pay for reasonable attorneys' fees and any
other costs of enforcement under this section. Any action taken
to impose or collect the penalty provided for in this subsection
shall be considered a civil action.
§325- Immunity. Apart from liabilities of assessed
entities pursuant to this part, there shall be no liability on
the part of and no cause of action against the department, its
independent contractors, or its employees for any action or
omission in the course of operating the universal immunization
purchase program.
§325- Rulemaking. The department may adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this part.
§325- Available choices. The department shall purchase
immunizations through the federal Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention contracted price list, or other group purchasing
negotiated discount rate, for which costs are funded pursuant to
this part. The department may make purchases from available
immunizations based on health care provider requests and shall
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx 12

Page 13 S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
not limit the immunizations the department purchases from those
available at a discounted rate; provided that the department may
choose to not purchase a specific immunization that has a low
volume of statewide health care provider requests.
§325- Immunization cost reimbursement to providers;
limits. This part shall have no impact on amounts paid to
providers to administer immunizations. No provider may bill any
assessed entity or any other person for any immunizations
supplied at no cost by the State."
SECTION 3. Section 36-27, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
II amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
" (a) Except as provided in this section, and
notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, from time to
time, the director of finance, for the purpose of defraying the
prorated estimate of central service expenses of government in
relation to all special funds, except the:
(1) Special out-of-school time instructional program fund
under section 302A-1310;
(2) School cafeteria special funds of the department of
education;
(3) Special funds of the University of Hawaii;
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx 13

Page 14
S.B. NO.
s"
C.D. 2
(4) Convention center enterprise special fund under
section 201B-8;
(5) Special funds established by section 206E-6;
(6) Aloha Tower fund created by section 206J-17;
(7) Funds of the employees' retirement system created by
section 88-109;
(8) Hawaii hurricane relief fund established under
chapter 431P;
(9) Hawaii health systems corporation special funds and
the subaccounts of its regional system boards;
(10) Universal service fund established under section
269-42;
(11) Emergency and budget reserve fund under section
328L-3;
(12) Public schools special fees and charges fund under
section 302A-1130;
(13) Sport fish special fund under section 187A-9.5;
(14) Neurotrauma special fund under section 321H-4;
(15) Glass advance disposal fee established by section
342G-82;
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx
iniiiiMMiiliiimHiH

Page 15 S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
(16) Center for nursing special fund under section
304A-2163;
(17) Passenger facility charge special fund established by
section 261-5.5;
(18) Solicitation of funds for charitable purposes special
fund established by section 467B-15;
(19) Land conservation fund established by section 173A-5;
(20) Court interpreting services revolving fund under
section 607-1.5;
(21) Trauma system special fund under section 321-22.5;
(22) Hawaii cancer research special fund;
(23) Community health centers special fund;
(24) Emergency medical services special fund;
(25) Rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special
fund established under section 261-5.6;
(26) Shared services technology special fund under section
27-43;
(27) Automated victim information and notification system
special fund established under section 353-136;
(28) Deposit beverage container deposit special fund under
section 342G-104;
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx

' S.B. NO.
8^1
C.D. 2
(29) Hospital sustainability program special fund under
section 346G-4;
(30) Nursing facility sustainability program special fund
under section 346F-4;
(31) Hawaii 3R's school improvement fund under section
302A-1502.4;
(32) After-school plus program revolving fund under section
302A-1149.5;
(33) Civil monetary penalty special fund under section
321-30.2; [and]
[+] (34) [•]-] Stadium development special fund under section
109-3.5[-]; and
(35) Universal immunization purchase special fund under
section 325- ,
shall deduct five per cent of all receipts of all other special
funds, which deduction shall be transferred to the general fund
of the State and become general realizations of the State. All
officers of the State and other persons having power to allocate
or disburse any special funds shall cooperate with the director
in effecting these transfers. To determine the proper revenue
base upon which the central service assessment is to be
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx 1

Page 17 S.B. NO 1434
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C D. 2
calculated, the director shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 for the purpose of suspending or limiting the
application of the central service assessment of any fund. No
later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular
session of the legislature, the director shall report all
central service assessments made during the preceding fiscal
year."
SECTION 4. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
for health - general administration (program ID HTH 907),
contained in the final version of House Bill No. 300 passed by
the legislature in the regular session of 2025, the sum of
$934,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2025-2026 shall be deposited into the universal immunization
purchase special fund.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the universal
immunization purchase special fund the sum of $934,000 or so
much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for
the purchase of immunizations and the administration of the
universal immunization funding program.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
health for the purposes of this Act.
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx 17
IIIIIIIIIHIIIOIIIIBIIIIIHH

Page 18 S.B. NO.
^§*1
C.D. 2
I SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
SB1434 CD2 LRB 25-1840.docx 18

S.B. NO. E
C.D. 2
APPROVED this 4th day of June , 2025

S.B. No. 1434, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 2, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1434, SD 1,HD 1,CD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 2, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby eertify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives